Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,148
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Dissenters' rights; procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or offer.

(1) A dissenter may notify the corporation in writing of his or her own estimate of the fair value of his or her shares and amount of interest due, and demand payment of his or her estimate, less any payment under section 21-20,145, or reject the corporation's offer under section 21-20,147 and demand payment of the fair value of his or her shares and interest due if:

(a) The dissenter believes that the amount paid under section 21-20,145 or offered under section 21-20,147 is less than the fair value of his or her shares or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated;

(b) The corporation fails to make payment under section 21-20,145 within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment; or

(c) The corporation, having failed to take the proposed action, does not return the deposited certificates or release the transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment.

(2) A dissenter waives his or her right to demand payment under this section unless he or she notifies the corporation of his or her demand in writing under subsection (1) of this section within thirty days after the corporation made or offered payment for his or her shares.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 148.